Hawaii statutes.
[§261E-14] Investigation of unfair or
deceptive practices. The commission, upon its own initiative or upon
complaint, if it considers the action to be in the public interest, may
investigate and determine whether any Hawaii air carrier has been or is engaged
in unfair or deceptive practices or unfair methods of competition in air
transportation or the sale thereof. If the commission finds, after notice and
hearing, that a carrier is engaged in unfair or deceptive practices or unfair
methods of competition, it shall order the carrier to cease and desist from
those practices or methods of competition. Notwithstanding section 480-2(d), a
complaint may be made by any person, a government, or competing carrier and may
relate to practices involving advertising and marketing, service and ancillary
services, pricing, or any other aspect of the operations of a Hawaii air
carrier. [L Sp 2008, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next